Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Industrial Hemp

250.355.
Testing of hemp plants, plant parts, and materials for compliance with KRS 260.850 to 260.869.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall receive samples and test hemp plants, plant parts, and materials grown or located within the Commonwealth in order to determine whether the hemp plants, plant parts, and materials are in compliance with the provisions of KRS

260.850

to

260.869

and the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall perform testing services as the primary laboratory for delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol as required by the department. The department may contract with other qualified laboratories to perform delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol testing services when required.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 45, § 11, effective March 20, 2017; 2020 ch. 1, § 1, effective February 10, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/20/2017).
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 45 contained 13 sections. Sections 1 to 10 of that Act amended, repealed and reenacted, or created statutes relating to the industrial hemp research program found in the statutory range of
KRS

260.850

to

260.869

. Sections 11 and 12 amended or created statutes in other KRS chapters, and Section 13 repealed some statutes within
KRS

260.850

to

260.869

. The correct reference should have been to only Sections 1 to 10 of this Act, the relevant range affecting the industrial hemp research program, and in codification the Reviser of Statutes has codified that language in this statute accordingly under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(h) to correct manifest clerical or typographical errors.